Hawaii statutes.
§312-8 Literacy and lifelong learning
program. (a) In addition to its other duties, the board of education,
through the state librarian, shall:

(1) Provide for the establishment and ongoing
operation of a literacy and lifelong learning program for the public libraries
in the State;

(2) Provide coordination and facilitation of the
activities of literacy service providers and literacy programs in the public,
private, and volunteer sectors; and

(3) Develop public-private sector literacy
partnerships for literacy program support.

(b) The objectives of the literacy and
lifelong learning program shall be to provide programmatic activities that
promote intergenerational learning and well-being by improving parents' skills
and attitudes toward education; increasing children's learning skills;
enhancing parenting skills; and uniting adults and children in positive
educational experiences.

(c) The literacy and lifelong learning program
shall not affect existing department of education programs relating to adult
education as provided under sections 302A-432 to 302A-435. [L 1993, c 361, pt
of §1; am L 1996, c 89, §13; am L 1997, c 310, §1; am L 2001, c 109, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next